New Jersey, session 221, S3031.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2015, c.116 (C.52:32-31.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Contracting agency" means the State or any board, commission, committee, authority or agency of the State. "Department" means the Department of the Treasury. "Disabled veteran" means a resident of this State who is certified by the federal Department of Veterans Affairs as having any degree of service-connected disability. "Disabled veterans' business" means a business which [has its principal place of business in the State,] is independently owned and operated and at least 51% of which is owned and controlled by persons who are disabled veterans or a business which [has its principal place of business in this State and] has been officially verified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a service disabled veteran-owned business for the purposes of department contracts pursuant to federal law. "Disabled veterans' business set-aside contract" means a contract for goods, equipment, construction or services which is designated as a contract with respect to which bids are invited and accepted only from disabled veterans' businesses, or a portion of a contract when that portion has been so designated. (cf: P.L.2015, c.116, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT The Set-Aside Act for Disabled Veterans Businesses defines a disabled veterans' business as a business which has its principal place of business in the State, is independently owned and operated, and at least 51% of which is owned and controlled by persons who are disabled veterans, or a business which has its principal place of business in this State and has been officially verified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a service disabled veteran-owned business for the purposes of department contracts pursuant to federal law. The act also includes a goal that contracting agencies will award at least 3% of their contracts to disabled veterans' businesses. This bill removes the requirement that the businesses have a principal place of business in the State of New Jersey.  This change may increase the pool of businesses and subcontractors eligible to compete for the State contracts, which may help contracting agencies meet the goal that they award at least of 3% of their contracts to disabled veterans businesses.